Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.150.530

High-performance public buildings—Implementation rules—Energy conservation report review.

(1) In adopting implementation rules, the superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with the department of enterprise services, shall review and modify the current requirement for an energy conservation report review by the department of enterprise services.

(2) In adopting implementation rules, the superintendent of public instruction shall:

(a) Review and modify the current requirements for value engineering, constructibility review, and building commissioning;

(b) Review private and public utility providers' capacity and financial/technical assistance programs for affected public school districts to monitor and report utility consumption for purposes of reporting to the superintendent of public instruction as provided in RCW 39.35D.040;

(c) Coordinate with the department of enterprise services, the state board of health, the department of ecology, federal agencies, and other affected agencies as appropriate in their consideration of rules to implement this section.

[ 2015 c 225 s 26; 2006 c 263 s 326; 2005 c 12 s 7.]

NOTES:

Findings—Purpose—Part headings not law—2006 c 263: See notes following RCW 28A.150.230.